New York, session 2025-2026, S7034.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Honoring 2 Our Pledge to Eliminate Antisemitism (HOPE) act". 3 § 2. Legislative intent. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure 4 that individuals of Jewish faith, heritage, or identity are fully 5 protected from discrimination. This act is not intended to infringe upon 6 the First Amendment rights guaranteed by the United States Constitution, 7 nor the free speech protections afforded under the Constitution of the 8 state of New York. 9 § 3. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 79-r to 10 read as follows: 11 § 79-r. Adoption of the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance 12 definition of antisemitism. 1. As used in this section, the following 13 terms shall have the following meanings: 14 (a) "Antisemitism" shall have the same meaning as provided for in the 15 working definition of antisemitism adopted by the International Holo- 16 caust Remembrance Alliance (IHRA) on May twenty-sixth, two thousand 17 sixteen, and shall include the contemporary examples of antisemitism set 18 forth therein. 19 (b) "State agency" shall mean any office, department, board, commis- 20 sion, bureau, division, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of 21 the state. 22 2. In reviewing, investigating, or deciding whether there has been a 23 violation of any rule or policy prohibiting discriminatory acts, a state EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01172-04-5 S. 7034--A 2 1 agency shall take into consideration the definition of antisemitism as 2 set forth in this section for purposes of determining whether an alleged 3 act was motivated by discriminatory antisemitic intent, including but 4 not limited to claims brought pursuant to article fifteen of the execu- 5 tive law. 6 3. A state agency shall apply the same legal standard as applicable to 7 like claims of discrimination arising under laws of this state, includ- 8 ing article fifteen of the executive law. 9 4. For the purposes of training of state personnel related to discrim- 10 ination and anti-bias training, the definition of antisemitism described 11 in this section shall be used as an educational tool to familiarize 12 staff and officials with antisemitism. 13 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.